Illinois, session 104th, SB1665.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 7 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/7)7    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 8    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 9record that contains information that is exempt from 10disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 11that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 12to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 13shall make the remaining information available for inspection 14and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 15be exempt from inspection and copying: 16        (a) Information specifically prohibited from 17    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 18    regulations implementing federal or State law. 19        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 20    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 21    or a court order. 22        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 23    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and   SB1665- 2 -LRB104 11320 BDA 21406 b1    specifically designed to provide information to one or 2    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 3    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 4        (c) Personal information contained within public 5    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 6    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 7    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 8    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 9    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 10    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 11    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 12    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 13    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 14    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 15    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 16    privacy. 17        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 18    created in the course of administrative enforcement 19    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 20    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 21    extent that disclosure would: 22            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 23        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 24        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 25        agency that is the recipient of the request; 26            (ii) interfere with active administrative   SB1665- 3 -LRB104 11320 BDA 21406 b1        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 2        that is the recipient of the request; 3            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 4        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 5        hearing; 6            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 7        confidential source, confidential information 8        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 9        who file complaints with or provide information to 10        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 11        penal agencies; except that the identities of 12        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 13        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 14        local government, except when disclosure would 15        interfere with an active criminal investigation 16        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 17        request; 18            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 19        techniques other than those generally used and known 20        or disclose internal documents of correctional 21        agencies related to detection, observation, or 22        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 23        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 24        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 25        request; 26            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law   SB1665- 4 -LRB104 11320 BDA 21406 b1        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 2            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 3        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 4        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 5    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 6    record management system if the law enforcement agency 7    that is the recipient of the request did not create the 8    record, did not participate in or have a role in any of the 9    events which are the subject of the record, and only has 10    access to the record through the shared electronic record 11    management system. 12        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 13    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 14    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 15    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 16    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 17    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 18    Board. 19        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 20    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 21    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 22        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 23    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 24        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 25    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 26    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those   SB1665- 5 -LRB104 11320 BDA 21406 b1    materials are available in the library of the correctional 2    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is 3    confined. 4        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 5    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 6    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 7    materials include records from staff members' personnel 8    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 9    information. 10        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 11    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 12    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 13    through an administrative request to the Department of 14    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of 15    Mental Health. 16        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 17    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 18    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 19    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 20    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 21    institution or facility.22        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 23    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 24    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 25    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 26    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited   SB1665- 6 -LRB104 11320 BDA 21406 b1    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 2    or school address, work telephone number, social security 3    number, or any other identifying information, except as 4    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 5    or claim. 6        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 7    requested by a person committed to the Department of 8    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 9    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 10    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and 11    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 12    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or 13    claim. 14        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, 15    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 16    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 17    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 18    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and 19    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 20    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 21    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 22    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents. 23        (f-1) Any studies, drafts, notes, recommendations, 24    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 25    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 26    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record is   SB1665- 7 -LRB104 11320 BDA 21406 b1    not exempt if the record has remained in draft form for 2    more than a 12-month period and public dollars were spent 3    by a unit of local government to conduct such a study. 4        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 5    information obtained from a person or business where the 6    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 7    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary, 8    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 9    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 10    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 11    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 12    requested.13        The information included under this exemption includes 14    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 15    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 16    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 17    company within the investment portfolio of a private 18    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 19    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 20    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 21    to the aggregate financial performance information of a 22    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 23    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 24    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 25    held company within the investment portfolio of a private 26    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a   SB1665- 8 -LRB104 11320 BDA 21406 b1    privately held company may cause competitive harm.2        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 3    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 4    to disclosure. 5        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 6    agreement, including information which if it were 7    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage 8    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 9    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 10    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 11    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 12    award or final selection is made. 13        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 14    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 15    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 16    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 17    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 18    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 19    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 20    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 21    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate 22    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 23    legal rights of the general public. 24        (j) The following information pertaining to 25    educational matters:26            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other   SB1665- 9 -LRB104 11320 BDA 21406 b1        examination data used to administer an academic 2        examination; 3            (ii) information received by a primary or 4        secondary school, college, or university under its 5        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 6        their academic peers; 7            (iii) information concerning a school or 8        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 9        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 10        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and11            (iv) course materials or research materials used 12        by faculty members. 13        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 14    submissions, and other construction related technical 15    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 16    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 17    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 18    including, but not limited to, power generating and 19    distribution stations and other transmission and 20    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 21    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers, 22    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 23    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 24    security. 25        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the 26    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the   SB1665- 10 -LRB104 11320 BDA 21406 b1    public body makes the minutes available to the public 2    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 3        (m) Communications between a public body and an 4    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 5    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 6    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 7    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative 8    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 9    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 10    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 11        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 12    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 13    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 14    cases in which discipline is imposed. 15        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 16    with automated data processing operations, including, but 17    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 18    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 19    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 20    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 21    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other 22    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 23    security of the system or its data or the security of 24    materials exempt under this Section. 25        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters 26    between public bodies and their employees or   SB1665- 11 -LRB104 11320 BDA 21406 b1    representatives, except that any final contract or 2    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 3        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 4    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 5    an applicant for a license or employment. 6        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 7    to real estate purchase negotiations until those 8    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 9    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 10    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 11    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 12    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 13    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 14    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 15    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 16    until a sale is consummated. 17        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 18    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 19    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 20    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 21    Insurance or self-insurance (including any 22    intergovernmental risk management association or 23    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 24    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 25        (t) Information contained in or related to 26    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by,   SB1665- 12 -LRB104 11320 BDA 21406 b1    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 2    for the regulation or supervision of financial 3    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 4    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 5    law. 6        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 7    the disclosure of secret or confidential information, 8    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 9    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 10    Electronic Transactions Act. 11        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 12    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 13    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 14    community's population or systems, facilities, or 15    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 16    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 17    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 18    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 19    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 20    include such things as details pertaining to the 21    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to 22    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 23    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 24        (w) (Blank). 25        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or 26    security of generation, transmission, distribution,   SB1665- 13 -LRB104 11320 BDA 21406 b1    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 2    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 3    Illinois Power Agency. 4        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 5    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 6    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 7    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities 8    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 9    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 10    Commission. 11        (z) Information about students exempted from 12    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 13    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 14    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 15    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 16    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 17        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 18    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 19        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 20    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 21    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice 22    Mortality Review Team Act. 23        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 24    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 25    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or 26    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.  SB1665- 14 -LRB104 11320 BDA 21406 b1        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 2    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 3    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 4    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 5        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 6    information of persons who are minors and are also 7    participants and registrants in programs of park 8    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 9    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 10    associations.11        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 12    information of participants and registrants in programs of 13    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 14    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 15    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 16    minors.17        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 18    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 19    2012. 20        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 21    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force 22    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 23    School Code and any information contained in that report. 24        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 25    detained by the Department of Human Services under the 26    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to   SB1665- 15 -LRB104 11320 BDA 21406 b1    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 2    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 3    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 4    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 5    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 6    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 7    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of 8    Corrections.9        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 10    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 11        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 12    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 13    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 14    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 15    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 16    of a governmental entity or a person. 17        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 18    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 19    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 20    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 21    the procedure.22        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 23    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 24    Confidential Reporting Act. 25        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the 26    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back   SB1665- 16 -LRB104 11320 BDA 21406 b1    Act. 2        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 3    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 4        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 5    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 6    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 7    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological 8    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 9    Act.10        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 11    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 12        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 13    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 14        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 15    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 16    protected health information, including demographic 17    information, that may be contained within or extracted 18    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 19    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 20    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 21    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45 22    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 23    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 24    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 25    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR 26    160.103.   SB1665- 17 -LRB104 11320 BDA 21406 b1        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 2    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 3    competitive bidding requests by the Department of 4    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 5    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 6Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted from public records 7prior to disclosure under this Act. 8    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a 9public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 10agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 11behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 12governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 13Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 14for purposes of this Act. 15    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 16information or limit the availability of records to the 17public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 18in this Act. 19(Source: P.A. 102-38, eff. 6-25-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 20102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 102-752, eff. 5-6-22; 102-753, eff. 211-1-23; 102-776, eff. 1-1-23; 102-791, eff. 5-13-22; 102-982, 22eff. 7-1-23; 102-1055, eff. 6-10-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 23103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 248-4-23; 103-540, eff. 1-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, 25eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25.)